trunk/apertium-tg-fa/apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ابپتثچجحَخِديذةرزژسشصضطظعغقکگلىمنهیئونكفهؤپءٔأآ</alphabet>
  <xi:include xmlns:xi="http://www.w3.org/2001/XInclude" href="apertium-tg-fa.symbols.xml"/>
  <pardefs>

<!--
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[۰۱۲۳۴۵۶۷۸۹]+([.,][۰۱۲۳۴۵۶۷۸۹]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
-->
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>،</l>
          <r>،<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__ی">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ی</l>
          <r><j/>ی<s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ی</l>
          <r><j/>ی<s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l><b/>ی</l>
          <r><j/>ی<s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__ه">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ه</l>
          <r><j/>ه<s n="enc"/><s n="izo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ٔ</l>
          <r><j/>ه<s n="enc"/><s n="izo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ه</l>
          <r><j/>ه<s n="enc"/><s n="izo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l><b/>ه</l>
          <r><j/>ه<s n="enc"/><s n="izo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__را">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ﺭﺍ</l>
          <r><j/>ﺭﺍ<s n="enc"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>را</l>
          <r><j/>را<s n="enc"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l><b/>را</l>
          <r><j/>را<s n="enc"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="P__ن">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ن‌</l>
          <r>ن<s n="neg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ن</l>
          <r>ن<s n="neg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="P__prefixes">
      <e>
        <par n="P__ن"/>
        <p>
          <l>می‌</l>
          <r>می<s n="me"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="P__ن"/>
        <p>
          <l>ﺏ‌</l>
          <r>ﺏ<s n="bi"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <par n="P__ن"/>
        <p>
          <l>می</l>
          <r>می<s n="me"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <par n="P__ن"/>
        <p>
          <l>می<b/></l>
          <r>می<s n="me"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <par n="P__ن"/>
        <p>
          <l>ﺏ</l>
          <r>ﺏ<s n="bi"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>من</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>تو</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>او</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- him or her -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>وی</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ما</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>شما</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>آنها</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- human only -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ایشان</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ﺩﺭ__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هنوز__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="و__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="که__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="این__det">
      <e>
        <p> 
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دوم__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Find out what ~in means -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ین</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="یک__num">
      <e>
        <p> 
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ﺩﻭ__num">
      <e>
        <p> 
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="تاجیکستان__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="فروغ__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__را"/>
        <par n="S__ه"/>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ها</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__را"/>
        <par n="S__ه"/>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
      </e>
      <!-- entry without ZWNJ analyse only -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ها</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__را"/>
        <par n="S__ه"/>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دهند__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__را"/>
        <par n="S__ه"/>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌گان</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__را"/>
        <par n="S__ه"/>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>گان</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__را"/>
        <par n="S__ه"/>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="personal subject pronouns"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="و"><i>و</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ای"><i>ای</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="که"><i>که</i><par n="که__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="این"><i>این</i><par n="این__det"/></e>
    <e lm="همین"><i>همین</i><par n="این__det"/></e>
    <e lm="آن"><i>آن</i><par n="این__det"/></e>
    <e lm="دوم"><i>دوم</i><par n="دوم__det"/></e>
    <e lm="افراختن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>افرا</i><par n="اندا/ختن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="فرستادن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>فرست</i><par n="نه/ادن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="یارستن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>یار</i><par n="زی/ستن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="تبدیل"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>تب</i><par n="تب/دیل__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="گماشتن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>گما</i><par n="گذ/شتن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="پالودن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>پال</i><par n="س/ودن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="پختن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>پ</i><par n="پ/ختن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="کشیدن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>کش</i><par n="پر/یدن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="پنداشتن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>پندا</i><par n="گذ/شتن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="نوشتن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>نو</i><par n="ر/شتن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="یک"><i>یک</i><par n="یک__num"/></e>
    <e lm="سه"><i>سه</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="پنج"><i>پنج</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="هفت"><i>هفت</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="نه"><i>نه</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="سیزده"><i>سیزده</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="هفده"><i>هفده</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="سی"><i>سی</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="هفتاد"><i>هفتاد</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="دوصد"><i>دوصد</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="از"><i>از</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="با"><i>با</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="بر"><i>بر</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="برای"><i>برای</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="به"><i>به</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="بی"><i>بی</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="چون"><i>چون</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="در"><i>در</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="مثل"><i>مثل</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="تا"><i>تا</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="گروه"><i>گروه</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دودمان"><i>دودمان</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="میلیون"><i>میلیون</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="هوانورد"><i>هوانورد</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="رأی دهند"><i>رأی<b/>دهند</i><par n="دهند__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بازو"><i>بازو</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مرغ"><i>مرغ</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="حالت"><i>حالت</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دانه"><i>دانه</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="سگ"><i>سگ</i><par n="ﺭﻭﺯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ازبکستان"><i>ازبکستان</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="آنتیگوا و باربودا"><i>آنتیگوا<b/>و<b/>باربودا</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="پاناما"><i>پاناما</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="زامبیا"><i>زامبیا</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="قبرس"><i>قبرس</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="لسوتو"><i>لسوتو</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="نیکاراگوآ"><i>نیکاراگوآ</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="کارولینای شمالی"><i>کارولینای<b/>شمالی</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="بَنگِلور"><p><l>ﺐَﻧبَنگِلور</l><r>ﺐﻧگﻝﻭﺭ</r></p><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="باراک اوباما"><i>باراک<b/>اوباما</i><par n="فروغ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="هیلاری کلینتون"><i>هیلاری<b/>کلینتون</i><par n="فروغ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="فروغ"><i>فروغ</i><par n="فروغ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="کی"><i>کی</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="از این رو"><i>از<b/>این<b/>رو</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="جلو"><i>جلو</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بالا"><i>بالا</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بطور بیش از حد"><i>بطور<b/>بیش<b/>از<b/>حد</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="سوا از"><i>سوا<b/>از</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="برخلاف"><i>برخلاف</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="باسانی"><i>باسانی</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ملایم"><i>ملایم</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ان"><i>ان</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><a/></r>
      </p>
      <par n="numeros"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="coma"/>
    </e>
